Washington statutes.
RCW 19.285.902

Short title—2007 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 937).

This chapter may be known and cited as the energy independence act.

[ 2007 c 1 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 937, approved November 7, 2006).]